tests/data/merging-paths-mono.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖšŠčČðđÐ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="e/n__num">
      <e>       <p><l>n</l>          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="en">              <i>e</i><par n="e/n__num"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
